Massachusetts, session 194th, S903.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Office of 
Medicaid shall, in consultation with the Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association and its 
non-acute care hospitals, take actions to support community discharge for MassHealth patients 
currently awaiting discharge in post-acute care hospitals to provide improved access to patients 
awaiting acute hospital care. Such actions shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (i) 
revising language describing approval for administrative days in MassHealth beneficiary notices 
regarding service determinations in non-acute care hospitals; (ii) adopting a transparent approach 
regarding adverse determinations for MassHealth beneficiary receiving non-acute hospital 
services, including standard timelines, coverage criteria, and appeals processes that are clear to 
providers and consumers; and (iii) expanding and developing community resources to support 
discharge to independent living in community settings for MassHealth beneficiaries with 
chronic, medically complex conditions.  

of 5 13  SECTION 2. Section 13A of Chapter 118E of the General Laws, shall be amended by 
inserting at the end thereof the following: 
To establish Medicaid rates for non-acute care hospitals, the division of medical 
assistance shall use as base year costs for rate determination purposes the reported costs of the 
calendar year not more than 2 years prior to the current rate year. 
SECTION 3. Sections 38 and 41 of Chapter 197 of the Acts of 2024 are hereby repealed.  
SECTION 4. Subsection (b) of section 24 of Chapter 197 of the Acts of 2024 shall be 
amended by inserting after the words “acute care hospital”, the words “non-acute care hospital”.  
SECTION 5. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the 
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
“Payer” the group insurance commission under chapter 32A of the General Laws, the 
division of medical assistance under chapter 118E of the General Laws, insurance companies 
organized under chapter 175 of the General Laws, non-profit hospital service corporations 
organized under chapter 176A of the General Laws, medical service corporations organized 
under chapter 176B of the General Laws, health maintenance organizations organized under 
chapter 176G of the General Laws and preferred provider organizations organized under chapter 
176I of the General Laws, or a utilization review organization acting under contract with the 
aforementioned entities. 
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all payers shall not require 
prior authorization for the transition of any inpatient of an acute care hospital or non-acute 
hospital to home health agencies certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services  

of 5 34  SECTION 6. Section 16CC of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official 
edition, shall be amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:  
(k) The secretary of health and human services shall establish within the statewide long 
term care ombudsman office a complex care ombudsman program to assist acute & post-acute 
care hospitals with discharges to lower level post-acute care settings; provided further, that such 
program shall ensure that at least one complex care case manager shall be assigned to each of the 
5 EMS regions of the state to assist the hospitals in each region with discharges to lower level 
post-acute care settings”. 
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Secretary of 
Health and Human Services or a designee, in conjunction with the Division of Medical 
Assistance, shall establish a regional pilot program to increase the capacity of staffed long-term 
care beds, beds for patients with dementia diagnoses, and beds for geriatric patients with 
psychiatric diagnoses in the state’s nursing facilities; provided, that the pilot may review the 
prior temporary program that added short-term rehabilitation capacity in all regions of 
Massachusetts and shall support patient care transitions to reduce the number of patients who are 
medically ready for discharge but are not able to be transferred due to capacity constraints for 
post-acute care services; provided further, that the executive office shall consult with the 
Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, the Mass. Senior Care Association, LeadingAge 
Massachusetts, the Massachusetts Association of Behavioral Health Systems and other 
stakeholder groups to identify the capabilities necessary for nursing facilities to accept and care 
for additional patients in the identified categories and the workforce training necessary to support 
these capabilities, including programs to increase recruitment and retention of 1:1 nursing care 

of 5 56 staff for residents and best practices to treat residents diagnosed with Alzheimer’s disease or 
dementia. 
SECTION 8. Section 1 of Chapter 215 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
official edition, shall be amended by inserting at the end thereof the following.  
There shall be an Office of Adult Guardianship and Conservatorship Oversight within the 
Administrative Office of the Probate and Family Court to increase court oversight of guardians 
and conservators and guardian and conservator arrangements to protect older adults and adults 
with disabilities from abuse, financial exploitation, and neglect. Within said office there shall be 
an ombudsman who shall work across the divisions of the court to assist with the scheduling or 
expediting of cases before the courts or assist with other procedures.  
SECTION 9. Chapter 215 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, 
shall be amended by inserting at the end thereof the following: 
Section XX. Probate courts may schedule weekly or bi-weekly block sessions of 
healthcare cases for matters within their jurisdiction addressing the appointment or expansion of 
guardians, conservators, health care proxies or other matters that may be placed within their 
jurisdiction.  
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Secretary 
of Health and Human Services or a designee shall establish a task force to consider the co-
location of medical services at skilled nursing facilities including behavioral health and 
substance use disorder treatment services, building capacity for telehealth services, and the 
provision of devices and broadband services to support telehealth services in skilled nursing 
facilities.  

of 5 78  SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Secretary 
of Health and Human Services or a designee shall establish a pilot program for existing skilled 
nursing facilities s to serve as a teaching skilled nursing facilities to utilize and disseminate best 
practices in skilled nursing facility care in conjunction with nursing facility staff, students, 
teaching hospitals, and academic institutions to improve care for nursing home residents and 
foster careers in long-term care and geriatrics.  
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Secretary 
of Health and Human Services or a designee, in conjunction with the Administrative Office of 
the Trial Court, shall develop a public outreach campaign to recruit individuals including but not 
limited to retired attorneys, doctors, nurses, and social workers to serve as guardians and 
conservators for patients who have no identified persons to serve in these roles on their behalf. In 
the development of said outreach campaign, the Secretary shall consult with the Massachusetts 
Health & Hospital Association, Honoring Choices Massachusetts, the Massachusetts 
Guardianship Policy Institute, Massachusetts Bar Association, and other organizations that serve 
in roles to support guardians and conservators.